tests/verbs-TIA.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p1.excl.pl": 
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkoxptonenen
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkoxptonenena
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : natemenenen
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : natemenenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelelentamenen
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelelentamenen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelenemenen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktelhitehemaonenen
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktelhitehemaonenena
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelamenenen
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelamenenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemichitenen
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemichitenena
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktaskantamenen
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktaskantamenena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktahkenotemenen
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktahkenotemenena
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kteluwenen
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kteluwenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kshesemenen
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kshesemenena
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktahkenutemenen
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktahkenutemenena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p1.incl.pl": 
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktowatowenen
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktowatowenena
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelaxenemenen
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelaxenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p1.incl.pl": 
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : koxptonenen
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : koxptonenena
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kenatemenenen
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : natemenenenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p2.pl":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kelelentameneyo
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kelenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p2.pl":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktelhitehemaoneneyo
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kelameneneyo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p2.pl":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kemichiteneyo
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktaskantameneyo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p2.pl":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktahkenotemeneyo
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kteluweneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p2.pl":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kshesemeneyo
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktahkenutemeneyo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p2.pl":
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktowatoweneyo
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kelaxenemeneyo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p2.pl":
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : koxptoneneyo
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kenatemeneneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p3.pl":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : welelentameneyo
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : lenemeneyo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p3.pl":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : litehemaoneneyo
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kelameneneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p3.pl":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : michiteneyo
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : toskantameneyo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p3.pl":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : ahkenotemeneyo
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : teluweneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p3.pl":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kshesemeneyo
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : ahkenutemeneyo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p3.pl":
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : owatoweneyo
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : laxenemeneyo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p3.pl":
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : koxptoneneyo
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : natemeneneyo
